en: Gluten-free pasta
bg: Паста без глутен
de: Glutenfreie Nudeln
es: Pasta sin gluten
fi: gluteeniton pasta
fr: Pâtes alimentaires sans gluten
hr: Tjestenina bez glutena
it: Pasta senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije pastas
pl: Makaron bezglutenowy
pt: Macarrão sem glúten
ru: Безглютеновая паста
sv: Glutenfri pasta

en: Gluten-free dry pasta, Dry gluten-free pasta, Dried gluten-free pasta
fr: Pâtes sèches sans gluten

en: Cooked unsalted gluten-free dry pasta
fr: Pâtes sèches sans gluten cuites non salées

en: Gluten-free Spaghetti
bg: Спагети без глутен
de: Glutenfreie Spaghetti
es: Espaguetis sin gluten
fr: Spaghetti sans gluten
hr: Špageti bez glutena
it: Spaghetti senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije spaghetti

en: Gluten-free penne
bg: Пене без глутен
de: Glutenfreie Penne
es: Penne sin gluten
fr: Penne sans gluten
hr: Penne bez glutena
it: Penne senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije penne

en: Gluten-free penne rigate
bg: Пене Ригате без глутен
de: Glutenfreie Penne Rigate
es: Penne Rigate sin gluten
fr: Penne Rigate sans gluten
hr: Bezglutenske penne rigate
it: Penne Rigate senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije penne rigate

en: Gluten-free tagliatelles
bg: Талиатели без глутен
de: Glutenfreie Tagliatelle
es: Tagliatelles sin gluten
fr: Tagliatelles sans gluten
hr: Tagliatelle bez glutena
it: Tagliatelle senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije tagliatelle

fr: Coquillettes sans gluten
es: Fideos sin gluten
it: Coquillette senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije macaroni

en: Oat pasta
de: Hafernudeln
es: Pastas de avena
fi: Kaurapasta
fr: Pâtes d'avoine
hr: Zobena tjestenina
it: Pasta di avena
nl: Havermoutpastas

en: Common wheat pasta
fr: Pâtes de blé tendre, pâtes de froment

en: Barley pasta
de: Gerstenudeln
es: Pastas de cebada
fi: Ohrapasta
fr: Pâtes d'orge
hr: Ječmena tjestenina
it: Pasta di orzo
nl: Gerstpastas

en: Rye Pasta
de: Roggennudeln
es: Pastas de centeno
fi: Ruispasta
fr: Pâtes de seigle
hr: Tjestenina od raži
it: Pasta di segale
nl: Roggepastas

en: Spelt pastas
de: Dinkelteigwaren
es: Pastas de espelta
fi: Spelttipastat
fr: Pâtes d'épeautre
hr: Tjestenine od pira
nl: Speltpastas

fr: Pâtes d'épeautre complètes ou semi-complètes
es: Pastas de espelta integrales o semi-integrales
nl: Volkorenpastas

en: Khorasan pasta, Kamut pasta
es: Pastas de trigo de Jorasán, Pastas de kamut
fr: Pâtes de blé khorasan, Pâtes de kamut
hr: Khorasan tjestenina
nl: Khorasantarwepastas, Kamutpastas

en: Corn pasta
bg: Кукурузна паста
ca: Pasta de blat de moro
de: Maisteigwaren
es: Pastas de maíz
fi: Maissipasta
fr: Pâtes de maïs
he: פסטה מתירס
hr: Kukuruzna tjestenina
hu: Kukoricatészta
it: Pasta di mais
nl: Maispastas
pl: Makaron kukurydziany
ru: Кукурузная паста

en: Durum wheat pasta, Wheat pasta
bg: Паста от твърда пшеница
ca: Pasta de blat dur
de: Hartweizenteigwaren, Nudelprodukte aus Hartweizen
es: Pasta de trigo duro
fi: Durumvehnäpasta
fr: Pâtes de blé dur
he: פסטה מקמח דורום
hr: Tjestenina od durum pšenice
hu: Durumbúza tészta
it: Pasta di grano duro
nl: Durum tarwepastas
pl: Makarony z pszenicy durum, Makaron z pszenicy durum
ru: Макаронные изделия из муки твёрдой пшеницы, макаронные изделия из муки твердой пшеницы, макаронные изделия группы А, Макаронные изделия. Группа «А»
sv: Durumvetepasta, Pasta av durumvete

en: Whole durum wheat pasta, durum wholewheat pasta
es: Pastas de trigo duro integrales
fr: Pâtes de blé dur complet
hr: Tjestenina od punog zrna durum pšenice
it: Pasta di grano duro integrale
nl: Volkoren durum pasta

en: Durum wheat pasta vysshiy sort GOST
ru: Макаронные изделия группы А высший сорт по ГОСТ, Макаронные изделия группы А высшего сорта по ГОСТ, макаронные изделия из муки твёрдой пшеницы высший сорт ГОСТ

en: Semi-whole durum wheat pasta
es: Pastas de trigo duro semi-integrales
fr: Pâtes de blé dur semi-complet
it: Pasta di grano duro semi integrale